North Carolina statutes. Chapter 145. State Symbols and Other Official Adoptions.
§ 145-1.
State flower.

The dogwood is hereby adopted as the official flower of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1941, c. 289.

§ 145-2.
State bird.

The cardinal is hereby declared to be the official State bird of North Carolina.

History.

1943, c. 595.

§ 145-3.
State tree.

The pine is hereby adopted as the official State tree of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1963, c. 41.

§ 145-4.
State shell.

The Scotch bonnet is hereby adopted as the official State shell of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1965, c. 681.

§ 145-5.
State mammal.

The gray squirrel
(Sciurus carolinensis)
is hereby adopted as the official State mammal of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1969, c. 1207.

§ 145-6.
State saltwater fish.

The channel bass (red drum) is hereby adopted as the official State saltwater fish of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1971, c. 274.

§ 145-7.
State insect.

The honeybee is hereby adopted as the official State insect of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1973, c. 55.

§ 145-8.
State stone.

The emerald is hereby adopted as the official State precious stone of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1973, c. 136, s. 1.

§ 145-9.
State reptile.

The turtle is adopted as the official State reptile of the State of North Carolina, and the eastern box turtle is designated as the emblem representing the turtles inhabiting North Carolina.

History.

1979, c. 154, s. 1.

§ 145-10.
State rock.

Granite is adopted as the official State rock of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1979, c. 906, s. 1.

§ 145-10.1.
State beverage.

Milk is hereby adopted as the official State beverage of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1987, c. 347, s. 1.

§ 145-11.
State historical boat.

The Shad Boat is adopted as the official State historical boat of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1987, c. 366, s. 1.

§ 145-12.
State language.

Purpose. — English is the common language of the people of the United States of America and the State of North Carolina. This section is intended to preserve, protect and strengthen the English language, and not to supersede any of the rights guaranteed to the people by the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of North Carolina.

English as the Official Language of North Carolina. — English is the official language of the State of North Carolina.

Expired.

History.

1987, c. 480, s. 1; c. 877, s. 1.1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Language Rights and the Legal Status of English-Only Law in the Public and Private Sector,” see 20 N.C. Cent. L.J. 65 (1992).

§ 145-13.
The State dog.

The Plott Hound is adopted as the official dog of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1989, c. 773, s. 1.

§ 145-14.
The State Military Academy.

Oak Ridge Military Academy, in Oak Ridge, North Carolina, as long as it remains a military academy is adopted as the official military academy of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1991, c. 728, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1991, c. 728, s. 2, provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to give Oak Ridge Military Academy an honorary designation as the official military academy of North Carolina. It is not the intent of the General Assembly to establish a new State agency or educational institution or qualify Oak Ridge Military Academy for State funds and this act confers no liability on the State.”

§ 145-15.
State tartan.

The Carolina Tartan is adopted as the official tartan of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1991, c. 85, s. 1.

§ 145-16.
State Watermelon Festivals.

The Hertford County Watermelon Festival is adopted as the official Northeastern North Carolina Watermelon Festival. The Hertford County Watermelon Festival shall be observed annually during the last four days of the first week in August.

The Fair Bluff Watermelon Festival in Columbus County is adopted as the official Southeastern North Carolina Watermelon Festival. The Fair Bluff Watermelon Festival shall be observed annually during mid-July.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to appropriate funds to implement the provisions of this act.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to obligate Hertford County or Columbus County to expend funds for the purposes of this act.

History.

1993, c. 212, s. 1.

§ 145-17.
State vegetable.

The sweet potato is adopted as the official vegetable of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1995, c. 521, s. 3.

§ 145-18.
State fruit and State berries.

The official fruit of the State of North Carolina is the Scuppernong grape (Vitis genus).

The official red berry of the State is the strawberry (Fragaria genus).

The official blue berry of the State is the blueberry (Vaccinium genus).

History.

2001-488, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

The preamble to Session Laws 2001-488, provides:

“PART I. NORTH CAROLINA’S HERITAGE OF FARMING.

“Whereas, North Carolina’s economy originated and developed as an agrarian economy with a cornucopia of fruits and vegetables; and

“Whereas, the State takes great pride in its rich heritage of farming; and

“Whereas, there are still many families who base their livelihood in farming and who are continuing the North Carolina tradition of producing goods from our land; and

“Whereas, one of the main sources of agricultural production in the State is the production of fruits and berries of several varieties; and

“PART II.
THE SCUPPERNONG GRAPE.

“Whereas, North Carolina is the home of our nation’s first cultivated grape, the Scuppernong; and

“Whereas, the Scuppernong grape was named after the Scuppernong River in North Carolina; and

“Whereas, British explorers in 1584 and 1585 reported to Queen Elizabeth and Sir Walter Raleigh that the barrier islands of what is now, in part, Roanoke Island were full of grapes and that the soil of the land was ‘so abounding with sweet trees that bring rich and most pleasant gummes, grapes of such greatness, yet wild, as France, Spain, nor Italy hath not greater . . . ’; and

“Whereas, Sir Walter Raleigh’s colony discovered the famous Scuppernong ‘Mother Vineyard’ on Roanoke Island, a vine that is now over 400 years old and has a trunk over two feet thick; and

“Whereas, the State toast, penned in 1904, references North Carolina as the land ‘[w]here the scuppernong perfumes the breeze at night,’; and

“PART III.
THE STRAWBERRY AND THE BLUEBERRY.

“Whereas, there are over 1,700 acres of strawberries and over 3,600 acres of blueberries harvested in North Carolina each year; and

“Whereas, in 2000, strawberry growers in the State produced 23,000,000 pounds of strawberries, yielding $17,325,000 in revenues; and

“Whereas, in 2000, blueberry growers in the State produced 17,500,000 pounds of blueberries, resulting in an increase in the State’s economy of over $18,000,000 in revenues; and

“Whereas, these delicious berries are a good source of vitamins, a number of life-sustaining minerals, and dietary fiber;

“Whereas, the blueberry is an antioxidant, which has been proven to reduce cholesterol and lower the risk of heart disease; and

“Whereas, each year the Town of Chadbourn in Columbus County hosts the North Carolina Strawberry Festival, which is one of the most celebrated traditions in the State; and

“Whereas, the State of North Carolina does not have an official fruit nor an official berry; Now, therefore,”

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “In Vino Veritas: Does the Twenty-First Amendment Really Protect a State’s Right to Regulate Alcohol? An Overview of the North Carolina Wine Industry and the Continuing Wine Distribution Litigation,” see 31 Campbell L. Rev. 123 (2008).

§ 145-19.
State International Festival.

Folkmoot USA is adopted as the official international festival of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2003-315, s. 1.

§ 145-20.
State wildflower.

The Carolina Lily (Lilium michauxii) is adopted as the official wildflower of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2003-426, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

This section was originally enacted as

G.S. 145-19

. It has been renumbered as

G.S. 145-20

at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

The preamble to Session Laws 2003-426, provides: “Whereas, North Carolina is blessed with an abundance of wildflowers from the mountains to the coast; and

“Whereas, the Carolina Lily is a scarce and beautiful flower that is found throughout North Carolina in upland pine-oak woods and pocosins; and

“Whereas, the Carolina Lily (Lilium michauxii) is one of many plants named for the distinguished French botanist Andre Michaux who traveled widely in the southeastern United States; and

“Whereas, Andre Michaux (1747-1802), a genuine hero of science and exploration, referred to the North Carolina mountains as ‘the great botanical laboratory and paradise of North America’; and

“Whereas, the Carolina Lily, sometimes referred to as Michaux’s Lily, bears up to six reddish-yellow, spotted flowers with petals that bend backwards; and

“Whereas, each nodding flower grows to about three inches in diameter; and

“Whereas, this magnificent flower bears the name of our great State; and

“Whereas, the State of North Carolina does not have an official wildflower; Now, therefore,

“The General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:”

§ 145-21.
State Aviation Hall of Fame and Museum and State Museum of Aviation.

The Asheboro Municipal Airport is designated as the official location of the North Carolina Aviation Hall of Fame and the North Carolina Aviation Museum. The Wilmington International Airport is designated as the official location of the North Carolina Museum of Aviation.

History.

2003-363, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2003-263, s. 2, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to appropriate funds to implement the provisions of this act.”

Session Laws 2003-263, s. 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to obligate the City of Asheboro, the City of Wilmington, Randolph County, or New Hanover County to expend funds for the purposes of this act.”

§ 145-22.
State carnivorous plant.

The Venus flytrap (Dionaea muscipula) is adopted as the official carnivorous plant of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2005-74, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

The preamble to Session Laws 2005-74, provides: “Whereas, the Venus flytrap is a small flowering perennial plant that grows in boggy areas of the Southeastern United States; and

“Whereas, the Venus flytrap is unique in that it is a carnivorous plant characterized by leaves with hinged lobes that spring shut when stimulated by insects; and

“Whereas, the Venus flytrap is native to the Coastal Plain of North Carolina and is legally protected by the State as a species of special concern; and

“Whereas, the Venus flytrap deserves to be adopted as the official carnivorous plant of the State of North Carolina because it is a mysterious and wonderful natural resource; Now, therefore,”

§ 145-23.
State birthplace of traditional pottery.

The Seagrove area, including portions of Randolph, Chatham, Lee, Moore, and Montgomery Counties, is designated as the official location of the birthplace of North Carolina traditional pottery.

History.

2005-78, s. 1; 2006-264, s. 70.

Editor’s Note.

The preamble to Session Laws 2005-78, provides: “Whereas, the art of crafting traditional pottery in North Carolina began around 1750 in the Seagrove area, which today includes portions of Randolph, Chatham, Moore, and Montgomery Counties; and

“Whereas, this craft has been carried on for 200 years and, in some cases, by people who represent the eighth and ninth generation of potters in their families; and

“Whereas, early families of the Seagrove area associated with North Carolina traditional pottery included the Chriscoe, Cole, Craven, Luck, McNeill, Owen, and Teague families; and

“Whereas, the pottery craft is a tradition that encompasses both aesthetic and utilitarian elements in its design; and

“Whereas, the annual Seagrove Pottery Festival has become the premier traditional pottery event in the State; and

“Whereas, during the festival, thousands of people are drawn to pottery displays, demonstrations of pottery making, and the pottery auction; and

“Whereas, plans have been made to establish the Museum of North Carolina Traditional Pottery to preserve and perpetuate the history and tradition of North Carolina traditional pottery; and

“Whereas the North Carolina Pottery Museum was established in 1998 to promote an awareness of the history and heritage of North Carolina pottery making traditions; and

“Whereas, Seagrove is considered the State’s pottery capital; and

“Whereas, it is fitting to recognize the Seagrove area as the birthplace of North Carolina traditional pottery; Now, therefore,”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-264, s. 70, effective August 27, 2006, inserted “Lee.”

§ 145-24.
Official State dances.

Clogging is adopted as the official folk dance of North Carolina.

Shagging is adopted as the official popular dance of North Carolina.

History.

2005-218, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

The preamble to Session Laws 2005-218, provides: “Whereas, clogging and shagging are popular dances that have entertained both participants and spectators in this State for decades; and

“Whereas, clogging is a traditional American folk dance that developed during the Colonial period in the Southern Appalachian mountains of the United States; and

“Whereas, clogging has been influenced by European, African-American, and Native American folk dance traditions; and

“Whereas, clogging is characterized by distinct, dignified, and beautiful footwork performed by individuals, couples, and groups; and

“Whereas, a number of clogging events and competitions are held across the State each year; and

“Whereas, the shag is a form of swing dancing that evolved from the jitterbug and jump blues of the big band jazz era and originated at Carolina Beach during the 1940s; and

“Whereas, the shag is most often associated with beach music, which refers to songs that are rhythm and blues based and, according to Bo Bryan, a noted shag historian and resident of Beaufort County, is a term that was coined at Carolina Beach; and

“Whereas, rhythm and blues groups, such as Jimmy Cavallo and the Houserockers, bolstered the popularity of the shag during the 1940s when they performed in Fayetteville, White Lake, and other areas around the State; and

“Whereas, today, the shag is a recognized dance in national and international dance competitions held across the United States; and

“Whereas, North Carolina is home to some of the most successful national shag champions, including multiple championship title winners, including Charlie Womble, Jackie McGee, Michael Norris, LeAnn Best, and Sam and Sarah West; and

“Whereas, North Carolina natives Clarice Reavis of Fayetteville and Harry Driver of Dunn are recognized as Queen of Shag and Father of Shag respectively; and

“Whereas, numerous North Carolinians have been inducted into the Shaggers Hall of Fame; and

“Whereas, North Carolina has the most beach music clubs in the nation and has a number of radio stations that depend solely upon the listenership of shag enthusiasts; and

“Whereas, it is fitting to adopt clogging and shagging as official State dances; Now, therefore,”

§ 145-25.
State Christmas tree.

The Fraser fir (Abies fraseri) is adopted as the official Christmas tree of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2005-387, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

The preamble to Session Laws 2005-387, provides: “Whereas, North Carolina has 1,500 Christmas tree growers and produces more trees than any other state except Oregon; and

“Whereas, North Carolina tree growers produce over 50 million Fraser firs each year; and

“Whereas, the Fraser fir constitutes more than 90% of all the Christmas trees grown in North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the Fraser fir is named for John Fraser, a Scottish botanist who explored the Southern Appalachian mountains of North Carolina in the late 1700s; and

“Whereas, the Fraser fir is a pyramid-shaped tree that reaches a maximum height of 80 feet and a trunk diameter of one to one and one-half feet; and

“Whereas, the Fraser fir grows naturally only in the Southern Appalachians; and

“Whereas, Fraser fir trees grown in North Carolina have won the National Christmas Tree Association’s annual tree competition more than any other species; and

“Whereas, North Carolina contains innumerable mountain streams and coldwater fisheries habitats; and

“Whereas, these mountain streams are home to brook trout (Salvelinus fontinalis), which is North Carolina’s only native freshwater trout species; and

“Whereas, the Southern Appalachian form of brook trout is a scientifically-recognized unique and genetically distinct form locally known as ‘specks’ or ‘speckle’ trout because of the numerous specks on its skin; and

“Whereas, North Carolina is home to some 400 self-sustaining populations of Southern Appalachian brook trout, more than in any other state; and

“Whereas, these wild and colorful fish are important keystones of ecological diversity, indicators of outstanding water quality, and representatives of the pure and unspoiled areas that they inhabit; and

“Whereas, Southern Appalachian brook trout are cooperative sport fish, and may be caught by anglers using traditional fly-fishing equipment and locally-adapted fly patterns, thereby supporting extensive recreational fishing opportunities, economic development, and tourism; and

“Whereas, by their character and contribution, these unique fish are woven into the historical and cultural fabric of Western North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the Fraser fir deserves recognition as the official Christmas tree of the State of North Carolina and the Southern Appalachian brook trout deserves recognition as the official freshwater trout of the State of North Carolina; Now, therefore,”

§ 145-26.
State freshwater trout.

The Southern Appalachian strain of brook trout (Salvelinus fontinalis) is adopted as the official freshwater trout of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2005-387, s. 2.

Editor’s Note.

The preamble to Session Laws 2005-387, provides: “Whereas, North Carolina has 1,500 Christmas tree growers and produces more trees than any other state except Oregon; and

“Whereas, North Carolina tree growers produce over 50 million Fraser firs each year; and

“Whereas, the Fraser fir constitutes more than 90% of all the Christmas trees grown in North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the Fraser fir is named for John Fraser, a Scottish botanist who explored the Southern Appalachian mountains of North Carolina in the late 1700s; and

“Whereas, the Fraser fir is a pyramid-shaped tree that reaches a maximum height of 80 feet and a trunk diameter of one to one and one-half feet; and

“Whereas, the Fraser fir grows naturally only in the Southern Appalachians; and

“Whereas, Fraser fir trees grown in North Carolina have won the National Christmas Tree Association’s annual tree competition more than any other species; and

“Whereas, North Carolina contains innumerable mountain streams and coldwater fisheries habitats; and

“Whereas, these mountain streams are home to brook trout (Salvelinus fontinalis), which is North Carolina’s only native freshwater trout species; and

“Whereas, the Southern Appalachian form of brook trout is a scientifically-recognized unique and genetically distinct form locally known as ‘specks’ or ‘speckle’ trout because of the numerous specks on its skin; and

“Whereas, North Carolina is home to some 400 self-sustaining populations of Southern Appalachian brook trout, more than in any other state; and

“Whereas, these wild and colorful fish are important keystones of ecological diversity, indicators of outstanding water quality, and representatives of the pure and unspoiled areas that they inhabit; and

“Whereas, Southern Appalachian brook trout are cooperative sport fish, and may be caught by anglers using traditional fly-fishing equipment and locally-adapted fly patterns, thereby supporting extensive recreational fishing opportunities, economic development, and tourism; and

“Whereas, by their character and contribution, these unique fish are woven into the historical and cultural fabric of Western North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the Fraser fir deserves recognition as the official Christmas tree of the State of North Carolina and the Southern Appalachian brook trout deserves recognition as the official freshwater trout of the State of North Carolina; Now, therefore,”

§ 145-27.
State Collard Festival.

The Ayden Collard Festival is adopted as the official collard festival of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2007-28, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

The preamble to Session Laws 2007-28, provides: “Whereas, since 1975, the Town of Ayden has held an annual collard festival to bring the community and surrounding areas together in celebration of the Town’s farming and agricultural heritage; and

“Whereas, the Ayden Collard Festival has grown into a great marketing and promotional tool for the Ayden community, Pitt County, and eastern North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the Ayden Collard Festival should be adopted as the official collard festival of the State of North Carolina; Now, therefore.”

§ 145-28.
State food festival.

The Lexington Barbecue Festival is adopted as the official food festival of the Piedmont Triad Region of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2007-533, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2007-533, s. 1, enacted this section as

G.S. 145-27

; it was recodified as

G.S. 145-28

at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2007-533, s. 1, enacted this section as

G.S. 145-27

; it was recodified as

G.S. 145-28

at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

The preamble of Session Laws 2007-533, provides: “Whereas, the first barbecue restaurant opened in the Town of Lexington in 1919; and

“Whereas, Lexington has become well known for its barbecue and has been referred to as the Barbecue Capital of the World; and

“Whereas, since 1984, Lexington has held an annual Barbecue Festival; and

“Whereas, the Lexington Barbecue Festival has become one of the most popular food festivals in the country; and

“Whereas, at the Lexington Barbecue Festival more than 150,000 visitors enjoy delicious food as well as a number of rides, games, and regional music; and

“Whereas, during the Lexington Barbecue Festival, civic and nonprofit organizations sponsor events and sell goods to raise funds and present educational information to the public, and a number of local artists showcase and sell their crafts; and

“Whereas, the Lexington Barbecue Festival was named ‘One of the Top Ten Food Festivals in the Country’ by Travel and Leisure Magazine and a ‘Top 20 Event for the Month of October 2002’ by the Southeast Tourism Society; and

“Whereas, the Piedmont Triad Region of the State of North Carolina does not have an official food festival; Now, therefore,”.

§ 145-29.
State community theater.

The Thalian Association in Wilmington, North Carolina, is adopted as the official community theater of North Carolina.

History.

2007-68, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2007-68, s. 1, enacted this section as

G.S. 145-28

; it was recodified as

G.S. 145-29

at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

§ 145-30.
State potato festival.

The Albemarle Potato Festival is adopted as the official Irish potato festival of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2009-24, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

The preamble to Session Laws 2009-24, provides: “Whereas, North Carolina’s northeast region has been home of the Albemarle Potato Festival, now known as the North Carolina Potato Festival, for over 24 years; and

“Whereas, of the more than 17,000 acres statewide used for Irish potato cultivation, the northeast region of the Albemarle contains 12,000 of those acres; and

“Whereas, the economic impact of Irish potato farming is at least 13 to 16 million dollars annually in the northeast region; and

“Whereas, the festival showcases the Albemarle area’s major Irish potato producing counties, with Pasquotank County being the largest producer in the State; and

“Whereas, the festival entertainment, street fair, water activities, and evening dance draw attention throughout the northeast region; and

“Whereas, the tourism industry flourishes during the North Carolina Potato Festival, benefiting the economy of not only the northeast region but also the entire State; Now, therefore.”

§ 145-31.
State horse.

The Colonial Spanish Mustang is adopted as the official horse of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2010-6, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

The preamble to Session Laws 2010-6, provides: “Whereas, the wild horses living along the Outer Banks of North Carolina are considered to be descendants of the horses brought to the Americas by Spanish explorers and colonists beginning in the 16th century; and

“Whereas, these horses are known as Colonial Spanish Mustangs; and

“Whereas, these Colonial Spanish Mustangs have played a significant role in the history and culture of North Carolina’s coastal area for hundreds of years; Now, therefore.”

§ 145-32.
Honor and Remember Flag.

The Honor and Remember Flag created by Honor and Remember, Inc., is adopted as a symbol to honor and recognize members of the Armed Forces of the United States who have died in the line of duty.

History.

2010-191, s. 4; 2011-183, s. 106.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-183, s. 106, effective June 20, 2011, substituted “Armed Forces of the United States” for “United States Armed Forces.”

§ 145-33.
State Shad Festival; Blue Monday Shad Fry.

The Grifton Shad Festival is adopted as the official Shad Festival of the State of North Carolina.

The East Arcadia Blue Monday Shad Fry is adopted as the official Blue Monday Shad Fry of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2011-36, s. 1; 2013-282, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

The preamble to Session Laws 2011-36, provides: “Whereas, the Grifton Shad Festival, held annually since 1970, is the oldest festival in Pitt County and one of the longest running festivals in eastern North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the Grifton Shad Festival provides visitors with many family-oriented activities, such as a parade, arts and crafts, and historical exhibits; and

“Whereas, each year, citizens in the area demonstrate their community pride by volunteering to make the festival a success; Now, therefore.”

Session Laws 2013-282, in its preamble, provides: “Whereas, the community of East Arcadia has been holding an Annual Shad Fry on the Monday following Easter Sunday for more than 60 years; and

“Whereas, this Annual Shad Fry was founded and financed by Bernard Carter, Chester Graham, and Archie Graham around 1950; and

“Whereas, Jesse Blanks, Wendell Brown, and Jerry Graham have assumed this position since the 1988 death of Mr. Carter; and

“Whereas, this event has been supported by local men such as Teddy Hall, John Leslie Carter, Harry Blanks, Curtis Bowen, Cleo Spaulding, Odell Graham, George Graham, Sr., and Thurman Blanks, who catch, clean, and donate the shad; and

“Whereas, this event garners support from the Town of East Arcadia and surrounding communities and hosts visitors from across North Carolina and other states such as Maryland, New Jersey, Connecticut, Texas, and Washington; and

“Whereas, this is a day of reunion, remembering, and fellowship for all comers with upward of 1,000 individuals attending during the day; and

“Whereas, it is the desire of the community to continue this tradition; Now, therefore”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-282, s. 1, effective July 18, 2013, rewrote the section heading, which formerly read “State Shad festival”; designated the formerly undesignated provisions of this section as present subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

§ 145-34.
State herring festival.

The Herring Festival held in the Town of Jamesville is adopted as the official herring festival of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2011-59, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

The preamble to Session Laws 2011-59, provides: “Whereas, since 1949 the Town of Jamesville in Martin County has held an annual Herring Festival each spring; and

“Whereas, the Herring Festival is a vital fundraiser for the Town of Jamesville, Jamesville Fire Department, Jamesville Rescue Department, Jamesville Ruritan Club, and many local businesses and residents; and

“Whereas, the Herring Festival serves as a celebration of the heritage that was once an important way of life in the area; and

“Whereas, the Herring Festival offers visitors many family-oriented activities, such as a parade, arts and crafts, rides, games, live music, and local foods and traditions; and

“Whereas, each year, citizens in the area demonstrate their community pride by volunteering to make the festival a success; Now, therefore.”

§ 145-35.
State mineral.

Gold (Aurum) is adopted as the official State mineral of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2011-233, s. 1.

§ 145-36.
State sport.

Stock car racing is adopted as the official sport of North Carolina.

History.

2011-187, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

The preamble to Session Laws 2011-187, provides: “Whereas, stock car racing has played a significant role in the history, heritage, and culture of North Carolina; and

“Whereas, stock car racing leads the way in the motorsports industry in North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the motorsports industry has a six billion dollar economic impact in North Carolina annually and creates over 20,000 direct and indirect jobs; and

“Whereas, North Carolina continues to grow and advance the grass roots of the sport of stock car racing with over 30 short tracks located throughout the State hosting over 700 events per year; and

“Whereas, North Carolina educates and trains individuals in its University system and Community College system for jobs in stock car racing; and

“Whereas, North Carolina is the home of the coveted stock car racing NASCAR Hall of Fame and the NC Auto Racing Hall of Fame; and

“Whereas, North Carolina is the home of more than 90 percent of NASCAR Sprint Cup stock car race teams; and

“Whereas, Charlotte Motor Speedway hosts three stock car races annually in the NASCAR Sprint Cup series, the most in-season Sprint Cup events held at a single motorsports facility in the United States, and Charlotte Motor Speedway attracts more than one million visitors annually, most of whom are from other states; and

“Whereas, North Carolina is the home of ‘The King,’ Richard Petty, stock car racing legend Junior Johnson, dubbed ‘The Last American Hero’ by writer Tom Wolfe, and seven-time champion, the late Dale Earnhardt; and

“Whereas, North Carolina is the home of stock car racing, and North Carolina is committed to the continued growth and popularity of the sport; and

“Whereas, stock car racing should be adopted as the State’s official sport; Now, therefore.”

§ 145-37.
State Shrimp Festival.

The Sneads Ferry Shrimp Festival is adopted as the official shrimp festival of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2011-65, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2011-65, s. 1, enacted this section as

G.S. 145-33

. It has been renumbered as this section at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

The preamble to Session Laws 2011-65, provides: “Whereas, since 1970, the Town of Sneads Ferry has held an annual shrimp festival to bring the community and surrounding areas together in celebration of the Town’s coastal and aquacultural heritage; and

“Whereas, the Sneads Ferry Shrimp Festival has grown into a great marketing and promotional tool for the Sneads Ferry community, Onslow County, and eastern North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the Sneads Ferry Shrimp Festival should be adopted as the official shrimp festival of the State of North Carolina; Now, therefore.”

§ 145-38.
State butterfly.

The Eastern tiger swallowtail (Papilio glaucus) is adopted as the official State butterfly of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2012-29, s. 1.

§ 145-39.
State spring and fall livermush festivals.

The Shelby Livermush Festival is adopted as the official fall livermush festival of the State of North Carolina.

The Marion Livermush Festival is adopted as the official spring livermush festival of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2012-29, s. 1.

§ 145-40.
State mullet festival.

The Swansboro Mullet Festival is adopted as the official mullet festival of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2012-29, s. 1.

§ 145-41.
State fossil.

The fossilized teeth of the megalodon shark is adopted as the official fossil of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2013-189, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2013-189, in its preamble, provides: “Whereas, some of North Carolina’s official State symbols have been suggested by the State’s school children after they have had history, science, social studies, or geography lessons related to North Carolina; and

“Whereas, this year some of the suggestions range from the adoption of an official fossil to an official frog; and

“Whereas, the State of North Carolina has a number of unique official symbols but does not have an official fossil, frog, salamander, marsupial, folk art, or art medium; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark is an extinct shark species that lived over 1.5 million years ago; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark may have reached over 40 feet in length and weighed up to 100 tons; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark had serrated, heart-shaped teeth that may have grown to over seven inches in length; and

“Whereas, fossilized teeth of the megalodon shark have been found in North Carolina and throughout the world; and

“Whereas, North Carolina and the Southeast region of the United States lead the world in amphibian diversity; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog can be found in the Sandhills and Coastal Plain regions of North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog has been considered one of the most striking and beautiful frogs in the Southeast region of the United States; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog by name reflects one of North Carolina’s signature trees and ecosystems that have been a vital part of the State’s economic, cultural, and natural history since colonial times; and

“Whereas, North Carolina also leads the nation and world in salamander diversity, most notably in our Appalachian Mountains; and

“Whereas, the marbled salamander is found throughout the State and is unique in that it is a charismatic, striking, chunky-bodied, fossorial amphibian, of which no two are exactly alike in color pattern; and

“Whereas, according the North Carolina Wildlife Commission’s 2005 North Carolina Wildlife Action Plan, the pine barrens tree frog and the marbled salamander have been identified as priority species for population monitoring and conservation in North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is native to North Carolina and is the only marsupial found in North America; the female carries its underdeveloped young in a pouch until they are capable of living independently, similar to a kangaroo; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is one of the oldest and most primitive species of mammal found in North America; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is about the size of a large house cat with a triangular head; a long pointed nose; dark eyes; a long, scaly, prehensile tail; and short, black, leathery ears; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is nocturnal and lives in a wide variety of habitats, including deciduous forests, open woods, and farmland but prefers wet areas such as marshes, swamps, and streams; and

“Whereas, at age 65, Vollis Simpson, a self-taught folk artist, began making giant windmills known as ‘whirligigs’ at his home in Wilson, North Carolina; and

“Whereas, Mr. Simpson’s whirligigs have been exhibited at the North Carolina Museum of Art in Raleigh, the High Museum of Art in Atlanta, Georgia, and the Visionary Art Museum in Baltimore, Maryland, and at other locations, including New York, California, Canada, and England; and

“Whereas, Mr. Simpson and details of his artwork have been featured in many national magazines and in several books; and

“Whereas, the City of Wilson is developing the Vollis Simpson Whirligig Park to display a large collection of these whirligigs in historic downtown, which will be a one-of-a-kind destination for visitors; and

“Whereas, North Carolina’s clay-rich soil has contributed to the State’s pottery heritage; and

“Whereas, the use of clay has grown from the State’s early Native Americans making mostly utilitarian wares and European settlers continuing the traditions of their ancestors to today’s potters designing pottery with utilitarian and aesthetic elements; and

“Whereas, the pottery tradition continues to thrive in North Carolina, especially in the Seagrove area, which includes parts of Chatham, Lee, Moore, Montgomery, and Randolph Counties; and

“Whereas, clay continues to be an important art medium contributing to the State’s cultural, social, and economic prosperity; Now, therefore,”